Missouri, session 2026, HB2066.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 451.022, RSMo, is repealed, to read as follows:
[451.022. 1. It is the public policy of this state to recognize marriage
2 only between a man and a woman.
3 2. Any purported marriage not between a man and a woman is invalid.
4 3. No recorder shall issue a marriage license, except to a man and a
5 woman.
6 4. A marriage between persons of the same sex will not be recognized
7 for any purpose in this state even when valid where contracted.]
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.